Tennessee, session 114, HB0920.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-1-111(a)(1)(D)(iii), is amended by
deleting "April 1" and substituting "April 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0920
002651
- 1 -